public_html/app/tools/lang/morphology/dictionaries/vec.aff
FLAG num
SFX A ónber onberésimo/K [no]kónber
SFX A ónber onberésimoi/L [no]kónber
SFX A ónber onberéu/P [no]kónber
SFX A ónber onberí/O [no]kónber
SFX A ónber onbería/IMQ [no]kónber
SFX A ónber onberíatu/N [no]kónber
SFX A ónber onberíe/IQ [no]kónber
SFX A ónber onberíelo/R [no]kónber
SFX A ónber onberíu/P [no]kónber
SFX A ónber onberò/I [no]kónber
SFX A ónber onberòi/J [no]kónber
SFX A ónber onbese/H [no]kónber
SFX A ónber onbesi [no]kónber
SFX A ónber onbesta/H [no]kónber
SFX A ónber onbeste/H [no]kónber
SFX A ónber onbesti/H [no]kónber
SFX A ónber onbesto/H [no]kónber
SFX A ónber onbeva/IOQ [no]kónber
SFX A ónber onbevai/J [no]kónber
SFX A ónber onbevau/P [no]kónber
SFX A ónber onbeve/I [no]kónber
SFX A ónber onbevei/J [no]kónber
SFX A ónber onbevi/MO [no]kónber
SFX A ónber onbevo/I [no]kónber
SFX A ónber onbevoi/J [no]kónber
SFX A ónber onbi/EGM [no]kónber
SFX A ónber onbimo/K [no]kónber
SFX A ónber onbimoi/L [no]kónber
SFX A ónber onbion/K [no]kónber
SFX A ónber onbione/K [no]kónber
SFX A ónber onbionse/K [no]kónber
SFX A ónber onbisen/K [no]kónber
SFX A ónber onbisene/K [no]kónber
SFX A ónber onbisense/K [no]kónber
SFX A ónber onbision/K [no]kónber
SFX A ónber onbisione/K [no]kónber
SFX A ónber onbisionse/K [no]kónber
SFX A ónber onbison/K [no]kónber
SFX A ónber onbisone/K [no]kónber
SFX A ónber onbisonse/K [no]kónber
SFX A ónber onbiven/K [no]kónber
SFX A ónber onbivense/K [no]kónber
SFX A ónber onbivion/K [no]kónber
SFX A ónber onbivionse/K [no]kónber
SFX A ónber onbivié/O [no]kónber
SFX A ónber onbiviéu/P [no]kónber
SFX A ónber onbivon/K [no]kónber
SFX A ónber onbivonse/K [no]kónber
SFX A ónber onbié/O [no]kónber
SFX A ónber onbiéu/P [no]kónber
SFX A ónber onbo/IJ [no]kónber
SFX A ónber onbon/K [no]kónber
SFX A ónber onbone/K [no]kónber
SFX A ónber onbonse/K [no]kónber
SFX A ónber onbua/H [no]kónber
SFX A ónber onbuda/H [no]kónber
SFX A ónber onbude/H [no]kónber
SFX A ónber onbudi/H [no]kónber
SFX A ónber onbudo/H [no]kónber
SFX A ónber onbue/H [no]kónber
SFX A ónber onbui/H [no]kónber
SFX A ónber onbuo/H [no]kónber
SFX A ónber onbé/GO [no]kónber
SFX A ónber onbéa/IOQ [no]kónber
SFX A ónber onbée/I [no]kónber
SFX A ónber onbéelo/R [no]kónber
SFX A ónber onbéi/MO [no]kónber
SFX A ónber onbéimo/K [no]kónber
SFX A ónber onbéimoi/L [no]kónber
SFX A ónber onbéitu/N [no]kónber
SFX A ónber onbéo/I [no]kónber
SFX A ónber onbésimo [no]kónber
SFX A ónber onbéu/P [no]kónber
SFX A ónber onbévelo/R [no]kónber
SFX A ónber onbévimo/K [no]kónber
SFX A ónber onbévimoi/L [no]kónber
SFX A ónber onbévitu/N [no]kónber
SFX A ónber onbí/GO [no]kónber
SFX A ónber onbíu/P [no]kónber
SFX A ónber onbú [no]kónber
SFX A ónder onda [ns]pónder
SFX A ónder onda fónder
SFX A ónder onda skónder
SFX A ónder onde/HIJQ [ns]pónder
SFX A ónder onde/HIJQ fónder
SFX A ónder onde/HIJQ skónder
SFX A ónder ondeai/J [fkp]ónder
SFX A ónder ondeau/P [fkp]ónder
SFX A ónder ondede [fkp]ónder
SFX A ónder ondeei/J [fkp]ónder
SFX A ónder ondege [fkp]ónder
SFX A ónder ondemo/K [fkp]ónder
SFX A ónder ondemoi/L [fkp]ónder
SFX A ónder onden/K [fkp]ónder
SFX A ónder ondendo/EG [fkp]ónder
SFX A ónder ondene/K [fkp]ónder
SFX A ónder ondense/K [fkp]ónder
SFX A ónder ondente [fkp]ónder
SFX A ónder ondeoi/J [fkp]ónder
SFX A ónder onderalo/R [fkp]ónder
SFX A ónder onderatu/N [fkp]ónder
SFX A ónder onderave/QS [fkp]ónder
SFX A ónder onderemo/K [fkp]ónder
SFX A ónder onderemoi/L [fkp]ónder
SFX A ónder onderen/K [fkp]ónder
SFX A ónder onderense/K [fkp]ónder
SFX A ónder onderesi/O [fkp]ónder
SFX A ónder onderesiu/P [fkp]ónder
SFX A ónder onderiai/J [fkp]ónder
SFX A ónder onderiei/J [fkp]ónder
SFX A ónder onderimo/K [fkp]ónder
SFX A ónder onderimoi/L [fkp]ónder
SFX A ónder onderion/K [fkp]ónder
SFX A ónder onderionse/K [fkp]ónder
SFX A ónder onderisen/K [fkp]ónder
SFX A ónder onderisense/K [fkp]ónder
SFX A ónder onderision/K [fkp]ónder
SFX A ónder onderisionse/K [fkp]ónder
SFX A ónder onderisié/O [fkp]ónder
SFX A ónder onderisiéu/P [fkp]ónder
SFX A ónder onderison/K [fkp]ónder
SFX A ónder onderisonse/K [fkp]ónder
SFX A ónder onderié/O [fkp]ónder
SFX A ónder onderiéu/P [fkp]ónder
SFX A ónder onderon/K [fkp]ónder
SFX A ónder onderonse/K [fkp]ónder
SFX A ónder onderà/IMQ [fkp]ónder
SFX A ónder onderàe/Q [fkp]ónder
SFX A ónder onderài/J [fkp]ónder
SFX A ónder onderè/I [fkp]ónder
SFX A ónder onderèi/J [fkp]ónder
SFX A ónder onderé/O [fkp]ónder
SFX A ónder onderésimo/K [fkp]ónder
SFX A ónder onderésimoi/L [fkp]ónder
SFX A ónder onderéu/P [fkp]ónder
SFX A ónder onderí/O [fkp]ónder
SFX A ónder ondería/IMQ [fkp]ónder
SFX A ónder onderíatu/N [fkp]ónder
SFX A ónder onderíe/IQ [fkp]ónder
SFX A ónder onderíelo/R [fkp]ónder
SFX A ónder onderíu/P [fkp]ónder
SFX A ónder onderò/I [fkp]ónder
SFX A ónder onderòi/J [fkp]ónder
SFX A ónder ondese/H [fkp]ónder
SFX A ónder ondesi [fkp]ónder
SFX A ónder ondesta/H [fkp]ónder
SFX A ónder ondeste/H [fkp]ónder
SFX A ónder ondesti/H [fkp]ónder
SFX A ónder ondesto/H [fkp]ónder
SFX A ónder ondeva/IOQ [fkp]ónder
SFX A ónder ondevai/J [fkp]ónder
SFX A ónder ondevau/P [fkp]ónder
SFX A ónder ondeve/I [fkp]ónder
SFX A ónder ondevei/J [fkp]ónder
SFX A ónder ondevi/MO [fkp]ónder
SFX A ónder ondevo/I [fkp]ónder
SFX A ónder ondevoi/J [fkp]ónder
SFX A ónder ondi/EG [fkp]ónder
SFX A ónder ondi/M [ns]pónder
SFX A ónder ondi/M fónder
SFX A ónder ondi/M skónder
SFX A ónder ondimo/K [fkp]ónder
SFX A ónder ondimoi/L [fkp]ónder
SFX A ónder ondion/K [fkp]ónder
SFX A ónder ondione/K [fkp]ónder
SFX A ónder ondionse/K [fkp]ónder
SFX A ónder ondisen/K [fkp]ónder
SFX A ónder ondisene/K [fkp]ónder
SFX A ónder ondisense/K [fkp]ónder
SFX A ónder ondision/K [fkp]ónder
SFX A ónder ondisione/K [fkp]ónder
SFX A ónder ondisionse/K [fkp]ónder
SFX A ónder ondison/K [fkp]ónder
SFX A ónder ondisone/K [fkp]ónder
SFX A ónder ondisonse/K [fkp]ónder
SFX A ónder ondiven/K [fkp]ónder
SFX A ónder ondivense/K [fkp]ónder
SFX A ónder ondivion/K [fkp]ónder
SFX A ónder ondivionse/K [fkp]ónder
SFX A ónder ondivié/O [fkp]ónder
SFX A ónder ondiviéu/P [fkp]ónder
SFX A ónder ondivon/K [fkp]ónder
SFX A ónder ondivonse/K [fkp]ónder
SFX A ónder ondié/O [fkp]ónder
SFX A ónder ondiéu/P [fkp]ónder
SFX A ónder ondo/IJ [ns]pónder
SFX A ónder ondo/IJ fónder
SFX A ónder ondo/IJ skónder
SFX A ónder ondon/K [fkp]ónder
SFX A ónder ondone/K [fkp]ónder
SFX A ónder ondonse/K [fkp]ónder
SFX A ónder ondua/H [fkp]ónder
SFX A ónder onduda/H [fkp]ónder
SFX A ónder ondude/H [fkp]ónder
SFX A ónder ondudi/H [fkp]ónder
SFX A ónder ondudo/H [fkp]ónder
SFX A ónder ondue/H [fkp]ónder
SFX A ónder ondui/H [fkp]ónder
SFX A ónder onduo/H [fkp]ónder
SFX A ónder ondé/GO [fkp]ónder
SFX A ónder ondéa/IOQ [fkp]ónder
SFX A ónder ondée/I [fkp]ónder
SFX A ónder ondéelo/R [fkp]ónder
SFX A ónder ondéi/MO [fkp]ónder
SFX A ónder ondéimo/K [fkp]ónder
SFX A ónder ondéimoi/L [fkp]ónder
SFX A ónder ondéitu/N [fkp]ónder
SFX A ónder ondéo/I [fkp]ónder
SFX A ónder ondésimo [fkp]ónder
SFX A ónder ondéu/P [fkp]ónder
SFX A ónder ondévelo/R [fkp]ónder
SFX A ónder ondévimo/K [fkp]ónder
SFX A ónder ondévimoi/L [fkp]ónder
SFX A ónder ondévitu/N [fkp]ónder
SFX A ónder ondí/GO [fkp]ónder
SFX A ónder ondíu/P [fkp]ónder
SFX A ónder ondú [fkp]ónder
SFX A ónder onta skónder
SFX A ónder onte skónder
SFX A ónder onti skónder
SFX A ónder onto/H skónder
SFX A ónder osta [ns]pónder
SFX A ónder oste [ns]pónder
SFX A ónder osti [ns]pónder
SFX A ónder osto/H [ns]pónder
SFX A ónder uxa fónder
SFX A ónder uxe fónder
SFX A ónder uxi fónder
SFX A ónder uxo/H fónder
SFX A óner ona póner
SFX A óner one/HIJQ póner
SFX A óner oneai/J póner
SFX A óner oneau/P póner
SFX A óner onede póner
SFX A óner oneei/J póner
SFX A óner onege póner
SFX A óner onemo/K póner
SFX A óner onemoi/L póner
SFX A óner onen/K póner
SFX A óner onendo/EG póner
SFX A óner onene/K póner
SFX A óner onense/K póner
SFX A óner onente póner
SFX A óner oneoi/J póner
SFX A óner oneralo/R póner
SFX A óner oneratu/N póner
SFX A óner onerave/QS póner
SFX A óner oneremo/K póner
SFX A óner oneremoi/L póner
SFX A óner oneren/K póner
SFX A óner onerense/K póner
