public_html/app/tools/lang/morphology/dictionaries/vec.dic
aerar/A
dexalvear/A
ansimar/A
arsirar/A
aumentar/A
babar/A
bakar/A
inbalokar/A
strabalŧar/A
baokar/A
barikar/A
bastar/A
baukar/A
baxotar/A
xbendar/A
inbeverar/A
inbiavar/A
xbiñar/A
bixegar/A
boɉir/A
dexbolar/A
xbonbardar/A
inboreŧar/A
botiđar/A
xbragañar/A
xbranar/A
xbregar/A
brojar/A
brondolar/A
brusketar/A
dexbusolar/A
dexbuxolar/A
carlar/A
koncèñer/A
incepar/A
cokar/A
indir/A
prodegar/A
deskalsar/A
indivinar/A
doɉiđar/A
kondonar/A
indoronar/A
dubitar/A
đaliđar/A
inđónxer/A
rièser/A
ensir/A
estenuar/A
exular/A
fabregar/A
faliar/A
infangar/A
faŧar/A
kuantifegar/A
feliŧitar/A
ferir/A
festiđar/A
sfiamegar/A
afidar/A
refilar/A
sfinir/A
desfisir/A
fluir/A
desfojar/A
fondamentar/A
sformar/A
forteđar/A
frakar/A
infrapolar/A
fraturar/A
sfregar/A
frixar/A
fruñolar/A
perfumar/A
futuriđar/A
ingaɉar/A
galopar/A
xgañolar/A
ingarbuɉar/A
ingatejar/A
xgianŧar/A
ingoloxir/A
xgorgeđar/A
xgramolar/A
xgranelar/A
ingrasar/A
agredir/A
xgretolar/A
xgriñaŧar/A
xgronŧolar/A
gruñir/A
xguaratar/A
agurar/A
proibir/A
indovinar/A
inkiostrar/A
inrikir/A
intivar/A
iterar/A
inɉarmar/A
ɉelomarar/A
xɉoŧolar/A
skadenar/A
kalar/A
inkalkar/A
kalŧar/A
inkamuŧar/A
kànđer/A
skanpaniđar/A
skantinar/A
kapitar/A
deskapuɉar/A
deskargar/A
karpir/A
inkartonar/A
kastigar/A
inkatifar/A
katurar/A
inkavar/A
kaxamentar/A
inkoatar/A
akòjer/A
inkolar/A
deskolpar/A
komenŧiar/A
kondir/A
konkuasar/A
konpilar/A
kontrir/A
koñar/A
konkórer/A
inkordar/A
korèxer/A
skortegar/A
inkotir/A
skovèrđer/A
kréser/A
krokar/A
skrostar/A
kuacar/A
kucar/A
kuestionar/A
kukar/A
kupar/A
kuŧar/A
dexlanegar/A
xlapar/A
lasar/A
lavar/A
delegar/A
leskar/A
solevar/A
xlièđer/A
limitar/A
xliŧegar/A
xlogar/A
xlontanar/A
loxar/A
inlunar/A
macar/A
xmagrar/A
malar/A
dimandar/A
xmanetar/A
stramañar/A
marangonar/A
maridar/A
xmarŧir/A
dexmaskarar/A
matir/A
stramaŧar/A
maxenar/A
strameđar/A
dexmenar/A
dementir/A
ixmerdar/A
dexméter/A
konprométer/A
mexurar/A
minconar/A
xmirar/A
modular/A
amolir/A
amonir/A
sormontar/A
demoraliđar/A
inmorbidir/A
mormorar/A
moteđar/A
xmòver/A
tramuarar/A
munir/A
mustagar/A
muxegar/A
xnaređar/A
naxar/A
xnervar/A
nikiar/A
nodar/A
notiŧiar/A
nuklear/A
xñarar/A
subodorar/A
okelar/A
ondar/A
dexonorar/A
dexorbar/A
organeđar/A
inosar/A
oviar/A
pacugar/A
pagontar/A
paiŧar/A
paletar/A
palpierar/A
pandar/A
spanŧar/A
parer/A
sparir/A
partir/A
parteŧipar/A
oltrepasar/A
pasteđar/A
inpatar/A
rapatumar/A
spaventar/A
pedalar/A
apelar/A
spelukar/A
pénder/A
penetrar/A
pensionar/A
pepolar/A
perkotar/A
peskar/A
apetir/A
despetolar/A
inpeŧolatar/A
inpiagar/A
piatolar/A
konpiàxer/A
spikar/A
piñorar/A
piovexinar/A
pisolar/A
piturar/A
platinar/A
inplikar/A
polsar/A
spolveriđar/A
frapóner/A
supóner/A
ponsar/A
apontelar/A
trapónxer/A
konportar/A
pòrxer/A
inpotar/A
repoxar/A
premiar/A
preŧar/A
apreŧiar/A
privar/A
inprontar/A
spulegar/A
espurgar/A
putaniđar/A
rabotar/A
ragar/A
rajonar/A
rankar/A
irapar/A
raspar/A
reciđar/A
regolar/A
arénder/A
rexekar/A
riduŧar/A
inriŧar/A
koròder/A
roesar/A
rolar/A
rondar/A
rosir/A
rotamar/A
iruđenir/A
rumegar/A
inruvidir/A
insabionar/A
insakar/A
salariar/A
saltar/A
samar/A
insaonar/A
saŧiar/A
saxonar/A
scolar/A
asediar/A
sekurar/A
proseguir/A
segurar/A
deseɉar/A
insemenir/A
sentir/A
señar/A
sepelir/A
sesolar/A
asetar/A
siar/A
presidiar/A
sincerar/A
sisolar/A
skakañar/A
inskarpiar/A
skenar/A
skortar/A
skrutinar/A
insolar/A
someɉar/A
sorseɉar/A
ispaxemar/A
insperonar/A
despinar/A
spolar/A
star/A
starnir/A
istekar/A
estirpar/A
istokar/A
stranudar/A
stronŧar/A
stufar/A
sucéder/A
insuperbir/A
tafiar/A
takiđar/A
intantar/A
intarsiar/A
intavolar/A
sorainténder/A
stenprar/A
intrateñir/A
otèñer/A
terir/A
detestar/A
stirar/A
intolar/A
tonkar/A
intortiɉar/A
destràer/A
trakeɉar/A
intrapolar/A
tràxer/A
tribolar/A
tronbar/A
tugar/A
ŧapar/A
ŧelebrar/A
inŧernir/A
ŧikolar/A
inŧipriar/A
ŧotar/A
urteđar/A
vagar/A
vanpir/A
travaxar/A
veɉar/A
vendemar/A
konveñir/A
kontravèñer/A
vergoñar/A
vertir/A
xvestir/A
invilir/A
viŧar/A
xvodar/A
volponar/A
ravòlxer/A
xautar/A
xelar/A
xgurar/A
xmeriliar/A
xufruir/A
